North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-05.1 Agricultural Experiment Station and Agricultural Research [Repealed]

4-05.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1997, ch. 50, § 17; 1997, ch. 57, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-02.
Agricultural experiment station. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1995, ch. 62, § 1; 1997, ch. 50, § 18; 1999, ch. 21, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-03.
Center directors — Research and research extension centers — Records and information. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1997, ch. 50, § 19; 1997, ch. 57, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-04.
Reports. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1995, ch. 350, § 3; 1997, ch. 50, § 20; 1997, ch. 57, § 3; 1999, ch. 21, § 15; 2003, ch. 459, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-05.
North Dakota state university main research center position adjustments — Budget section report. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1997, ch. 57, § 4; 1999, ch. 53, § 1; 2005, ch. 58, § 1; 2015, ch. 20, § 7, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 04-05.1-05 was amended 1 time and repealed by the 2017 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 5 of Chapter 45, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2020; and section 13 of Chapter 61, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2026.

4-05.1-06.
Dickinson research extension center. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1997, ch. 57, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-07.
Williston research extension center. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1997, ch. 57, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-07.1.
Grant funds — Acceptance — Use. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 57, § 13.

4-05.1-08.
Langdon research extension center. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1997, ch. 57, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-09.
Central grasslands research extension center. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1997, ch. 57, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-10.
Carrington research extension center. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1997, ch. 57, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-11.
Hettinger research extension center. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1997, ch. 57, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-12.
North central research extension center. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 13; 1997, ch. 57, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-13.
Board of visitors — Members — Inspection — Expenses — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 57, § 13.

4-05.1-14.
Mandan experiment station. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 54, § 44.

4-05.1-15.
Agronomy seed farm — Investment of reserve income fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 11; 1997, ch. 57, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-16.
State board of agricultural research and education — Membership — Terms. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 50, § 21; 1999, ch. 21, § 16; 2001, ch. 46, § 12; 2001, ch. 58, § 1; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, §
97; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-17.
Compensation of board members — Expenses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 50, § 22; 1999, ch. 21, § 17; 2001, ch. 46, § 13; 2009, ch. 72, §
2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-18.
State board of agricultural research and education — Chairman — Meetings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 50, § 23; 1999, ch. 21, § 18; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-19.
State board of agricultural research and education — Duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 50, § 24; 1999, ch. 21, § 19; 2001, ch. 46, § 14; 2001, ch. 58, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 4; 2013, ch. 51, § 12; 2017, ch. 373, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 04-05.1-19 was amended 1 time and repealed by the 2017 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 1 of Chapter 373, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2032; and section 13 of Chapter 61, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2026.

4-05.1-20.
Agricultural research fund — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 50, § 25; 2001, ch. 58, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-05.1-21.
State board of agricultural research and education — Apportionment of research funds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 50, § 26; 1999, ch. 21, § 20; 2001, ch. 46, § 15; 2001, ch. 58, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.